California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(b) The cities and the counties may use any funds available to them to match funds made available to them under this chapter, if the use of funds for such matching purposes is not prohibited by federal law. “Match,” as used in this chapter, means to provide for the payment of the cost of any project to the extent that such cost is not to be reimbursed from federal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 376, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2414.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the state’s vital interest to participate fully in the federal highway bridge replacement program. 

(b) The department shall, with its available resources, expedite bridge replacement projects in order that federal funds be used to full advantage as soon as they become available.

(c) The commission, in allocating funds, and the department, in expending funds, for bridge replacement projects, shall follow federal design standards so that the projects will be eligible for federal funds, except that this subdivision shall not apply to a project if the commission finds by resolution, after a public hearing, that application of the federal design standards would adversely affect public health or safety or would significantly increase the cost of the project to the state.

(d) Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of the department to negotiate with the appropriate federal agency for the purpose of gaining approval of a project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1240, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9.5. Federal Transportation Economic Stimulus Funds [2420. - 2424.]

2420.

This chapter may be cited as the Transportation Economic Stimulus Act of 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 21, Sec. 2.   Effective March 27, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2421.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Congress has enacted the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), which provides in part for supplemental federal funding to the states for purposes of the federal-aid highway program.

(b) It is in the interest of the state to ensure that the highway infrastructure investment funds apportioned to the state under the federal act are fully obligated within the constraints of that act.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, in consultation with the commission, regional transportation planning agencies, counties, and cities, shall have sufficient authority to make full and expeditious use of federal funds apportioned to the state for economic stimulus.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent allowable under the federal act, priority be given to the use of stimulus funds available for expenditure by the Department of Transportation for projects that repair or rehabilitate the existing transportation system and to advance funds for projects under the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 that have been delayed or are in jeopardy of being canceled due to the state’s inability to issue general obligation bonds in the short term. In the programming of these funds, consideration shall be given to activities that put Californians to work and provide needed economic stimulus throughout the state.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that highway infrastructure investment funds made available under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 are used to contribute to a transportation system that is in sound structural condition, accommodates all users, is environmentally sustainable, and allows for the efficient mobility of goods and people.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the deadlines for obligating and liquidating funds established by the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 apply to all federal funds appropriated by this chapter.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the recipients of highway infrastructure investment funds made available under the federal act, including state, regional, and local agencies, shall adhere to principles and policies that ensure government oversight and management of the contracting process to ensure taxpayer funds are spent wisely; contracts are not wasteful, inefficient, or subject to misuse; unnecessary no-bid and cost-plus contracts are avoided; and contracts are awarded according to the best interests of California taxpayers.

(h) As used in this chapter, “federal act” shall mean the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 21, Sec. 2.   Effective March 27, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2422.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Legislature hereby appropriates to the department the sum of two billion five hundred sixty-nine million five hundred sixty-eight thousand three hundred twenty dollars ($2,569,568,320), and any additional funds, made available to the state as highway infrastructure investment funds pursuant to Title XII of Division A of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 and apportioned to the state pursuant to Title 23 of the United States Code to carry out projects eligible under that act and in accordance with this chapter.

(b) The funds appropriated by this section shall be available for obligation and expenditure by the dates specified in the federal requirements implementing the federal act.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow for such flexibility as is necessary to permit the successful implementation of the appropriations made by this section. The Legislature hereby authorizes the Department of Finance to appropriately itemize and schedule these appropriations, or to make adjustments as are necessary, in order to successfully carry out the intent of the federal act.

(d) The Director of Finance shall, within 90 days after the enactment of this chapter, furnish the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the state budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, with a report that describes the schedule of funding. The Director of Finance shall provide notification to the Legislature of any changes in that schedule 30 days prior to any change taking effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 21, Sec. 2.   Effective March 27, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2423.

(a) The federal highway infrastructure investment funds made available to the state under the formula apportionments of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 shall be considered part of the surface transportation program as set forth in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 133 of Title 23 of the United States Code. These formula funds shall be apportioned 37.5 percent for expenditure by the state to be programmed by the department and allocated by the commission, and 62.5 percent to the metropolitan planning organizations, county transportation commissions, and regional transportation planning agencies in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 182.6.

(b) (1) Funds available to be programmed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be programmed for eligible projects consistent with the federal act and this chapter.

(2) (A) A minimum of nine hundred thirty-five million dollars ($935,000,000) of the funds available pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be programmed for projects in the state highway operations and protection program.

(B) Not more than three hundred ten million dollars ($310,000,000) of the funds available pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be loaned pursuant to Section 8879.77 of the Government Code to advance projects to be funded with moneys from the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006.

(c) Pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, 3 percent of the federal funds, which is approximately seventy-seven million dollars ($77,000,000), made available to the state shall be used for transportation enhancement activities. Funds allocated pursuant to this section for transportation enhancement activities are not subject to the requirements of the state transportation improvement program. Any funds apportioned to the state pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 133 of Title 23 of the United States Code shall be distributed such that 37.5 percent of these funds shall be made available to the department and allocated by the commission and 62.5 percent shall be made available to the metropolitan planning organizations, county transportation commissions, and regional transportation planning agencies in accordance with the formula in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 182.6.

(1) In programming and allocating these funds, the department and the metropolitan planning organizations, county transportation commissions, and regional transportation agencies shall give priority to the sponsors of eligible projects that partner with, or commit to employ the services of, a community conservation corps or the California Conservation Corps to construct or undertake the project, provided those projects meet the requirements of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

(2) After all eligible projects have been selected pursuant to paragraph (1), the department and the metropolitan planning organizations, county transportation commissions, and regional transportation agencies shall next give priority to projects that provide facilities for pedestrians and bicyclists, provided those projects meet the requirements of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

(3) After all eligible projects have been selected pursuant to paragraph (2), the department and the metropolitan planning organizations, county transportation commissions, and regional transportation agencies may fund any project eligible in accordance with paragraph (35) of subdivision (a) of Section 101 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that at least 40 percent of the funds apportioned to a metropolitan planning organization, county transportation commission, or regional transportation planning agency be available for suballocation by that entity to a city, county, or city and county for projects that meet the requirements of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 and this chapter.

(1) Any funds suballocated by a metropolitan planning organization, county transportation commission, or regional transportation planning agency that will not be obligated by a city, county, or city and county by the deadlines specified in the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 shall be reallocated and available for expenditure as determined by the metropolitan planning organization, county transportation commission, or regional transportation planning agency.

(2) A metropolitan planning organization, county transportation commission, or regional transportation agency that suballocates funds to a city, county, or city and county under this chapter shall establish reporting procedures for the city, county, or city and county to ensure that funds are obligated and expended in accordance with the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 and this chapter.

(e) (1) A metropolitan planning organization, county transportation commission, or regional transportation planning agency receiving funds under this chapter shall notify the department of the projected amount of obligational authority that the entity intends to use, including for funds that the entity suballocated to a city, county, or city and county pursuant to subdivision (d). The report shall include, but not be limited to, a list of projects that will be obligated by the following deadlines:

(A) By June 1, 2009, for the funds required to be obligated within 120 days of federal apportionment.

(B) By February 1, 2010, for any funds that will not be obligated within one year of federal apportionment.

(2) Any federal obligational authority that will not be used shall be redistributed by the department to other projects in a manner that ensures that the state will continue to compete for and receive increased obligational authority during the federal redistribution of obligational authority. To the extent practical, the funds shall be obligated within the geographic areas relinquishing the obligational authority.

(f) Funds apportioned by this chapter are not eligible to be exchanged for nonfederal State Highway Account funds as provided in subdivision (g) or (h) of Section 182.6.

(g) The public participation requirements under Title 23 of the United States Code shall apply to all transportation projects using federal funds made available pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 21, Sec. 2.   Effective March 27, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2424.

(a) The department, metropolitan planning organizations, county transportation commissions, regional transportation planning agencies, counties, cities, and a city and county shall comply with all reporting requirements to the Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) established in federal law regarding funds made available under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

(b) In complying with the requirements of subdivision (a), the department, metropolitan planning organizations, county transportation commissions, regional transportation planning agencies, counties, cities, and a city and county shall provide the same data they provide to the FHWA to the department under the same timelines required
 by the FHWA or federal law. Regional entities shall include in the data provided to the department information on the use of federal funds made available under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 that were suballocated to cities and counties within their jurisdiction.

(c) All jurisdictions that received and obligated or expended federal funds for transportation enhancement activities pursuant to federal law and this chapter shall include in the data they provide to the department pursuant to subdivision (b) a description of the number, value, and type of project that involved the participation of a community conservation corps or the California Conservation Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 172.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Grade Separation Projects [2450. - 2461.]

2450.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Grade separation” means, for the purpose of calculating the railroad contribution to the project, the theoretical structure necessary to separate the roadway from the railroad grade for the number of lanes on the existing highway and for the full width of the railroad corridor, in accordance with the current design standards of the department.

(b) “Project” means the grade separation and other structures
 that actually separate the vehicular roadway from the railroad tracks, and all approaches, ramps, connections, drainage, and other construction required to make the grade separation operable and to effect the separation of grades. A grade separation project may include provision for separation of nonmotorized traffic from the vehicular roadway and the railroad tracks. If a separation of nonmotorized traffic is not to be included in a project, there shall be an affirmative finding that the separation of nonmotorized traffic is not in the public interest. On any project where there is only one railroad track in existence, the project shall be built so as to provide for expansion to two tracks when the Director of Transportation determines that the project is on an existing or potential major railroad passenger corridor. The project may consist of:

(1) The alteration or reconstruction of existing grade separations.

(2) The construction of new grade separations to eliminate existing grade crossings.

(c) “Highway” means city street, a county highway, or a state highway which is not a freeway as defined in Section 257.

(d) “Railroad” means a railroad corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 315, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2451.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, “local agency” includes a city, a county, a separation-of-grade district, and any public entity that provides rail passenger transportation services.

(b) Before a separation-of-grade district may apply to the commission pursuant to this chapter for an allocation for a project, the district shall consult with and obtain the written consent of the city in which the project is located, or the county if the project is located in unincorporated
 territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2452.

Prior to July 1 of each year, the Public Utilities Commission shall establish a list, in order of priority, of projects that the commission determines to be most urgently in need of separation or alteration. The priority list shall be determined on the basis of criteria established by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 315, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2453.

From the funds set aside pursuant to Section 190, as well as from any other funds that may be set aside for purposes of this chapter, the California Transportation Commission shall make allocations for projects contained in the latest priority list established pursuant to Section 2452. Such allocations shall be made for preconstruction costs and construction costs. Where allocations are made to a local agency, the requirements of Sections 2456 and 2457 shall first be met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

2453.5.

The department may submit its comments and recommendations to the commission on any project for which an allocation is to be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1178, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2454.

Allocations made pursuant to Section 2453 shall be made on the basis of the following:

(a) An allocation of 80 percent of the estimated cost of the project shall be made; except that whenever contributions from other sources exceed 20 percent of the estimated cost, the allocation shall be reduced by the amount in excess of 20 percent of the estimated cost.

(b) On projects that eliminate an existing crossing, or alter or reconstruct an
 existing grade separation, no allocation shall be made unless the railroad agrees to contribute 10 percent of the cost of the project.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the total of these allocations for a single project shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) without specific legislative authorization. Cumulative allocations to a single project shall not exceed 80 percent of the cost to construct the project.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the California Transportation Commission may allocate up to fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to a single project if that project is the highest ranking project on the priority list established by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Section 2452.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (c),
 inclusive, a single project in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000), but not exceeding twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), shall be considered without specific legislative authority, if the project (A) is included in the Public Utilities Commission’s priority list of projects scheduled to be funded, (B) eliminates the need for future related grade separation projects, (C) provides projected cost savings of at least 50 percent to the state or local jurisdiction, or both of them, by eliminating the need for future projects, and (D) alleviates traffic and safety problems or provides improved rail service not otherwise possible. Projects approved pursuant to this subdivision shall be funded over a multiyear period, not to exceed five years, and the allocation for any one of those years shall not exceed the amount prescribed by subdivision (c) for a single project.

(2) Not more than one-half of the total allocation available in any one
 fiscal year for grade separation projects may be used for the purposes of this subdivision. An agency that has received an allocation for a project approved pursuant to this subdivision shall not be eligible for an allocation for another project under this subdivision for a period of 10 years from the date of approval of that project. However, if funds are available for allocation, as determined by the Department of Transportation, an agency may be eligible for an allocation for another project.

(e) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this section or any other provision of law, when the state or a local agency uses funds derived from federal sources in financing its share of project costs, the railroad contribution, where required by federal law or regulation, shall be computed pursuant to federal law.

(f) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this section or any other
 provision of law, when the state or a local agency uses state funds in financing a portion of project costs, the railroad contribution, to the extent determined pursuant to this section, shall be calculated based on the cost of the grade separation only, and not the cost of any other part of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 315, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2454.2.

The planned removal of trackage of the Sacramento Northern Railway, the construction of substitute tracks and track connections, the elimination of 10 existing grade crossings, the acquisition of necessary rights-of-way, and all necessary associated work and appurtenances, to enable Sacramento Northern Railway trains to operate via existing trackage of the Atchison, Topeka & Santa Fe Railway, in and adjacent to the City of Pittsburg, shall be eligible for an allocation under Section 2453. The Public Utilities Commission shall determine to what extent, if any, the railroad shall contribute to the project. Such eligibility shall not be contingent on whether the railroad
 agrees to contribute, and the California Highway Commission shall not deny an allocation on such grounds.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is necessary to enact this special law regarding the Pittsburg track removal and grade crossing elimination project because of the existence of the following special facts and circumstances:

The predominant traffic carried by the Sacramento Northern Railway consists of high explosives, bombs, shells, and ammunition destined for the United States Navy ammunition depot at Port Chicago. Such trains traverse residential areas, cross 10 streets at grade, and constitute a grave hazard to the life and safety of the residents of Pittsburg. Sacramento Northern Railway is willing to remove its tracks and operate its trains via the tracks of the Atchision, Topeka & Santa Fe Railway, which is already partially grade separated and which offers a safer route. However, Sacramento
 Northern Railway will sacrifice certain of its own facilities, will receive no benefits, and therefore is unwilling to contribute any portion of the cost incidental to the removal of its trackage or for the construction of substitute track connections and appurtenances or for the acquisition of rights-of-way.

Based on the foregoing, the Legislature therefore finds and declares that it is necessary that the Sacramento Northern track removal and relocation project in and adjacent to the City of Pittsburg shall be eligible for a grade separation allocation, and that subdivision (d) of Section 2454, relating to a contribution by the railroad, shall not apply for purposes of qualifying for an allocation under Section 2453.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2404.2 by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

2455.

After an allocation is made to a local agency by the commission, the local agency and the department shall enter into an agreement concerning the handling and accounting of funds, including procedures to permit prompt payment for the work accomplished, and relative to any other phase of the work. The procedures providing for prompt payment of work accomplished shall be drawn in such a manner as to avoid the necessity for the local agency to utilize funds in an amount greater than the local agency’s share of the project costs. Such agreement may establish procedures for the programming of the work of the project in order to assure optimum cash flow utilization of funds made
 available by the Legislature for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2405 by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2456.

An allocation for construction costs, including preconstruction costs if not already allocated, shall be made to a local agency only if it furnishes evidence satisfactory to the department that all necessary orders of the Public Utilities Commission have been executed, that sufficient local funds will be made available as the work of the project progresses, that all necessary agreements with affected railroad or railroads have been executed that, if required, all environmental impact reports have been prepared and approvals obtained, and that all other matters
 prerequisite to the award of the construction contract can be accomplished within two years after the allocation. Local funds shall be deemed available to the amount of any general obligation bonds authorized but unsold if it is determined that those bonds may be issued and sold by the local agency at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 298, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2457.

Preconstruction costs (engineering, right-of-way, preparation of environmental impact reports, and utility relocation) expended by a local agency prior to any allocation shall be included in the total cost of the project even though expended prior to an allocation. Allocations shall be made for preconstruction costs to a local agency that submits evidence satisfactory to the department that the local agency will be able to meet the requirements for an allocation for construction costs, and that preconstruction costs will exceed the local share of the cost of the project. A local agency may also proceed with the advertising for bids and the construction of a project without
 prejudice to its right to receive an allocation if an allocation is, in fact, made for such project within the same fiscal year that the construction contract was awarded.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2407 by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2458.

If a construction contract has not been awarded within two years after an allocation for construction costs, the commission may order the allocation canceled and those funds shall revert to the fund set aside for purposes of this chapter. All or any part of an allocation for preconstruction costs may be canceled and those funds shall revert to the fund set aside for purposes of this chapter upon a finding that insufficient progress is being made to complete the project. Where an allocation is canceled pursuant to this section, the local agency shall reimburse the
 fund set aside for purposes of this chapter the portion of the allocation that is not reverted as set forth in this section. The department shall determine, with the local agency, as to the time of repayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 315, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2459.

If the actual cost of the project is less than estimated, the allocations made for such project shall be reduced accordingly and the excess shall revert to the fund set aside for the purposes of this chapter. If the actual and necessary cost of the project exceeds the estimate, the allocations made for such project shall be augmented proportionately by a supplemental allocation. An allocation, however, need not be made for a supplemental allocation, unless the commission is satisfied that funds would have been allocated for the project had the actual costs been used in determining its ranking on the priority list.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2409 by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2460.

If more projects comply with the requirements of this chapter than can be financed from funds set aside for purposes of this chapter, allocations shall be made to those projects highest on the priority list established pursuant to Section 2452. The commission may make allocations for any project when it determines, at the time of allocation, that sufficient funds are available for all projects which are higher on the priority list and which are, or are reasonably expected to become, eligible during the fiscal year.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2410 (as added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1153) by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2460.5.

From funds remaining after allocations for projects higher on the priority list, the commission shall offer to allocate the remaining funds for the next eligible project on the priority list, even though the amount of the remaining funds is less than the amount the local agency is entitled to for that project.

The commission, in the next fiscal year, shall allocate to the local agency an additional amount equal to the difference between the amount the local agency was eligible to receive and the amount of the reduced
 allocation.

The total of the amount of allocations for a single project, including, but not limited to, any allocation pursuant to this section, shall not exceed the amount prescribed by subdivision (c) of Section 2454 without specific legislative authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 315, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2460.7.

A project that is on the priority list may be constructed by a local agency prior to the time that it reaches a high enough priority for funding under this chapter. The project shall retain its eligibility for listing on subsequent priority lists established by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Section 2452 by applying the traffic, accident, and other conditions existing at the project location at the time immediately preceding the start of construction.

If the project subsequently reaches a high enough priority for funding under this chapter, funds shall be
 allocated and paid to the local agency in the same manner, and under the same terms and conditions, as any other project funded under this chapter on the basis of the cost of construction of the project. To be eligible for subsequent funding under this section, both of the following requirements shall be met:

(a) The work on the project shall be performed under terms and conditions established by the department.

(b) The project has received the prior approval of the California Transportation Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1354 (Sec. 1).)
-------------------------------------------

2461.

Allocations for specific projects on the state highway system only shall be deemed expenditures within the county in which the project is situated for the purpose of compliance by the department and the commission with Sections 188 and 188.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 104.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Federal Aid for Rural Highway Public Transportation [2500. - 2507.]

2500.

This chapter may be cited as the Rural Highway Public Transportation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 781.)
-------------------------------------------

2501.

Federal law has authorized appropriations for expenditure for public mass transportation on highways in rural areas in order to enhance access of rural area populations to employment, health care, retail centers, education, and public services. The purpose of this chapter is to implement that program in this state. The boards of supervisors, city councils, and the department are authorized to do all things necessary and proper in their respective jurisdictions to secure the federal funds for use on rural highway public mass transportation projects in accordance with the intent of federal law and of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 42, Sec. 1.   Effective April 1, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

2503.

As used in this chapter, “rural areas” means areas as defined in Section 101 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 781.)
-------------------------------------------

2505.

The department shall establish operating procedures and take such other appropriate actions to comply with the provisions of this chapter and with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 781.)
-------------------------------------------

2506.

All applications for federal funds for rural public mass transportation projects under Section 147 of the Federal Aid Highway Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-87) shall be made through the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 781.)
-------------------------------------------

2507.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may authorize the Controller to make payments to claimants for work performed on a rural public mass transportation project prior to the execution of a formal grant agreement subject to all of the following conditions:

(a) The work is expressly included in a program of projects approved by the department and submitted to the United States Department of Transportation for funding.

(b) A grant agreement for the work is subsequently executed between the department and the claimant.

(c) Funds are specifically appropriated and available for the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   Effective April 1, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Federal Aid for Safer Off-System Roads [2520. - 2537.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2520. - 2521.]

2520.

This chapter may be cited as the Federal Aid for Safer Off-System Roads Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1270.)
-------------------------------------------

2521.

By the Federal-Aid Highway Amendments of 1974, and the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1976, Congress has enacted Section 219 of Title 23 of the United States Code establishing a Safer Off-System Roads Program for the construction, reconstruction, and improvement (including, but not limited to, the correction of safety hazards, the replacement of bridges and the elimination of high-hazard locations and roadside obstacles) of any toll-free road, which is not on any federal-aid system and which is under the jurisdiction of and maintained by a public authority and open to public travel. Boards of supervisors, city councils, the department, and the commission may do all things necessary and proper in their respective jurisdictions to secure the federal funds available under this program for local roads and state highways in accordance with the intent of the federal act and this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [2530. - 2537.]

2530.

(a) The federal act provides that sums apportioned to a state under this program be made available for projects throughout the state on a fair and equitable basis. It is in the interest of the state and its counties and cities that the federal funds made available for the Safer Off-System Roads Program be made available by the commission for use on county roads and city streets.

(b) The funds shall be apportioned among the counties in accordance with the formula prescribed by federal law for apportionment among the states, except that no county shall receive less than one-half of 1 percent of each year’s apportionment.

(c) The distribution of funds among the cities within each county and the county shall be determined by agreement between the county and a majority of the cities, which cities shall include a majority of the municipal population within the county. A copy of the agreement shall be filed with the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1270.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.

Within 60 days after the apportionment is made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2530, each county shall notify the department as to the amount of the apportionment the county and its cities wish to claim.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1270.)
-------------------------------------------

2533.

The county or city responsible for the construction of a safer off-system road project shall prepare the plans, specifications, and estimates of costs for the construction of the project in conformance with federal requirements for off-system roads, shall certify the necessary right-of-way, and shall submit such documents to the department in order to qualify for federal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   Effective June 20, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

2534.

All funds not claimed pursuant to Section 2532 shall lapse.

The lapsed funds of a county may be reallocated for expenditure upon safer off-system road projects of counties and cities within the other counties of the county group, as specified in Section 187, which included that county, based upon their proportional share of the original apportionment within that county group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 198, Sec. 2.   Effective June 20, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

2535.

By agreement with the department, a county or city may transfer all or part of the funds apportioned to it under this chapter to a qualifying safer off-system roads project on a road under other governmental jurisdiction in the same county, or to a qualifying project in another county under such terms and conditions as are agreed upon by the department and the counties or cities, as the case may be, involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1270.)
-------------------------------------------

2537.

The counties and cities may use any funds available to them to match federal funds made available under this chapter, if the use of funds for such matching purposes is not prohibited by federal law. “Match,” as used in this chapter, means to provide for the payment of the cost of any project to the extent that such cost is not to be reimbursed from federal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1270.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Abandoned Railroad Lines [2540. - 2549.]

2540.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is the policy of the state to acquire abandoned railroad lines when the right-of-way for such lines has a potential public transportation use including, but not limited to, a use for highways, busways, bicycles, pedestrians, or guideways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

2542.

The Abandoned Railroad Account is hereby created in the State Transportation Fund. The money in the Abandoned Railroad Account is appropriated to the department for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1130.)